Maryland, session 2026, HB0009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 3A. 3–1–1 NONEMERGENCY COMMUNITY INFORMATION AND REFERRAL
SYSTEMS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0009*

HOUSE BILL 9
1–3A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3.5–801
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(C) “BOARD” MEANS THE MARYLAND 3–1–1 OVERSIGHT BOARD
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 1–3A–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “CHATBOT” MEANS A COMPUTER PROGRAM AVAILABLE THROUGH A
PHONE NUMBER, A WEBSITE, OR AN APPLICATION THAT SIMULATES HUMAN
CONVERSATION THROUGH TEXT OR VOICE, USING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO
RESPOND TO TYPED QUESTIONS USING INFORMATION FROM CURATED,
AGENCY–APPROVED SOURCES SUCH AS GOVERNMENT WEBSITES, SERVICE
CATALOGS, ORDINANCES, FORMS, AND GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM
LAYERS.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE 3–1–1 PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) “3–1–1 SYSTEM” MEANS A TELEPHONE SERVICE OR OTHER
TECHNOLOGY USED TO ACCESS A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICE LINE, DESIGNED
FOR REPORTING AND RESOLVING COMMUNITY INFRASTRUCTURE AND SERVICE
ISSUES ON A NONEMERGENCY BASIS.
(G) “VOICEBOT” MEANS A COMPUTER PROGRAM AVAILABLE THROUGH A
PHONE NUMBER THAT SIMULATES HUMAN CONVERSATION USING ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TECHNOLOGY THAT:
(1) RESPONDS TO VOCAL QUESTIONS OVER THE PHONE USING
INFORMATION FROM CURATED, AGENCY–APPROVED SOURCES SUCH AS
GOVERNMENT WEBSITES, SERVICE CATALOGS, ORDINANCES, FORMS, AND
GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM LAYERS; AND
(2) ROUTES CALLS TO APPROPRIATE DESTINATIONS.
1–3A–02.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND 3–1–1 OVERSIGHT BOARD IN THE MARYLAND
INFORMATION NETWORK.

HOUSE BILL 9 3
(B) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF:
(1) TWO MEMBERS OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) TWO MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY
THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) A PERSON WITH EXPERTISE IN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
(II) A PERSON WITH EXPERTISE IN GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION
SYSTEMS; AND
(III) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC TO SERVE AS THE
CHAIR OF THE BOARD; AND
(4) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM EACH OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK;
(II) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY;
(III) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT;
(IV) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF AGING;
(V) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES;
(VI) THE MARYLAND 9–1–1 BOARD;
(VII) THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES;
(VIII) THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL LEAGUE;
(IX) A COUNTY IN THE STATE THAT IS NOT PARTICIPATING IN
THE PROGRAM UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND DOES NOT HAVE AN
EXISTING 3–1–1 SYSTEM;

HOUSE BILL 9
(X) A COUNTY IN THE STATE THAT IS NOT PARTICIPATING IN
THE PROGRAM UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND HAS AN EXISTING 3–1–1
SYSTEM;
(XI) A COUNTY IN THE STATE THAT IS PARTICIPATING IN THE
PROGRAM UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND DOES NOT HAVE AN EXISTING
3–1–1 SYSTEM; AND
(XII) A COUNTY IN THE STATE THAT IS PARTICIPATING IN THE
PROGRAM UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND HAS AN EXISTING 3–1–1
SYSTEM.
(C) THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1), (2),
AND (4)(IX) THROUGH (XII) OF THIS SECTION SHALL TERMINATE AFTER THE BOARD
SUBMITS THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 1–3A–05(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST FOUR TIMES PER CALENDAR YEAR.
(E) FOR PURPOSES OF THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT, A PROJECT SITE VISIT OR
EDUCATIONAL FIELD TOUR MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED A MEETING OF THE BOARD IF
NO ORGANIZATIONAL BUSINESS IS CONDUCTED.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE BOARD;
BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(G) THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK SHALL PROVIDE STAFF TO
THE BOARD.
1–3A–03.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) DESIGNATE COUNTIES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM;
(2) ESTABLISH EVALUATION CRITERIA FOR THE PROGRAM;

HOUSE BILL 9 5
(3) REVIEW VENDOR APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED TO THE BOARD BY
THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK UNDER § 1–3A–04(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE
AND SELECT A VENDOR;
(4) ENSURE 3–1–1 SYSTEMS ALIGN WITH BEST PRACTICES FOR
TECHNOLOGY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND EQUITY;
(5) APPROVE AND COORDINATE STATEWIDE MARKETING STRATEGIES
FOR THE PROGRAM UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(6) IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM; AND
(7) DEVELOP A SET OF UNIFIED STATEWIDE DATA STANDARDS FOR
3–1–1 SYSTEMS.
(B) MARKETING STRATEGIES APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(1) ACCESSIBLE;
(2) MULTILINGUAL; AND
(3) CULTURALLY COMPETENT.
1–3A–04.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A 3–1–1 PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO EVALUATE AND EXPAND THE USE
OF 3–1–1 SYSTEMS IN THE STATE.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL DESIGNATE TWO COUNTIES THAT HAVE 3–1–1
SYSTEMS AND TWO COUNTIES THAT DO NOT HAVE 3–1–1 SYSTEMS TO PARTICIPATE
IN THE PROGRAM.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK
TO:
(1) SOLICIT REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS FROM VENDORS FOR
TECHNOLOGY PLATFORMS AND OTHER SERVICES NECESSARY TO RUN 3–1–1
SYSTEMS FOR THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) SUBMIT A LIST OF POSSIBLE VENDORS TO THE BOARD.

HOUSE BILL 9
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2027, THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A
CHATBOT IN EACH COUNTY DESIGNATED BY THE BOARD UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH CHATBOT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) MULTILINGUAL SUPPORT;
(II) INTEGRATION WITH GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM
DATA FOR ACCURATE ROUTING; AND
(III) CLEAR ESCALATION PROTOCOLS TO ROUTE COMPLEX
REQUESTS TO LIVE AGENTS.
(3) (I) EACH COUNTY PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM SHALL
DESIGNATE THE SOURCES A CHATBOT MAY USE IN RESPONDING TO QUESTIONS.
(II) 1. THE VENDOR OF THE 3–1–1 SYSTEM CHOSEN TO HOST
A CHATBOT SHALL ANALYZE THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CHATBOT BASED ON USER
FEEDBACK REGARDING ACCURACY OF CHATBOT RESPONSES.
2. A. THE VENDOR SHALL INVESTIGATE AN ANSWER
THAT A USER DESIGNATES AS INACCURATE.
B. IF THE SOURCE IS DETERMINED TO BE INACCURATE,
THE AGENCY OPERATING THE SOURCE WEBPAGE SHALL UPDATE IT TO BECOME
ACCURATE.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, THE BOARD SHALL
ESTABLISH A VOICEBOT IN EACH PARTICIPATING COUNTY.
(2) EACH VOICEBOT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) MULTILINGUAL SUPPORT;
(II) THE ABILITY TO TRANSFER CALLS TO 9–1–1, 2–1–1, AND
9–8–8, AS NEEDED;
(III) INTEGRATION WITH GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM
DATA FOR ACCURATE ROUTING; AND
(IV) CLEAR ESCALATION PROTOCOLS TO ROUTE COMPLEX
REQUESTS TO LIVE AGENTS.

HOUSE BILL 9 7
(3) THE VENDOR OF THE 3–1–1 SYSTEM CHOSEN TO HOST A VOICEBOT
SHALL ANALYZE THE PERFORMANCE OF THE VOICEBOT IN THE SAME WAY AS THE
CHATBOT UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(3)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE BOARD SHALL IMPLEMENT THE
PROGRAM IN EACH COUNTY IN THE STATE ACCORDING TO THE IMPLEMENTATION
PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER § 1–3A–05(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
1–3A–05.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, THE BOARD, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK, SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE PROGRESS OF THE
PROGRAM.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) CALL DEFLECTION TRACKING BASED ON THE REDUCTION IN
9–1–1 CALLS FOR THAT TIME PERIOD;
(II) USER SATISFACTION;
(III) ACCESSIBILITY OF THE 3–1–1 SYSTEM;
(IV) COSTS SAVED BY A PARTICIPATING COUNTY, IF ANY;
(V) AN EVALUATION OF THE INTEGRATION OF THE CHATBOTS
AND VOICEBOTS INTO EACH COUNTY; AND
(VI) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR IMPROVEMENT.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
MARYLAND INFORMATION NETWORK, SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT:
(1) EVALUATES THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM
INCLUDING:
(I) COST EFFECTIVENESS OF THE CHATBOT AND VOICEBOT;

HOUSE BILL 9
(II) EQUITY IN SERVICE ACCESS;
(III) CHALLENGES OF INTEGRATING THE CHATBOT AND
VOICEBOT INTO COUNTY SYSTEMS;
(IV) USER SATISFACTION; AND
(V) CALL VOLUME DATA FOR 9–1–1 IN THE PROGRAM
COUNTIES; AND
(2) CREATES A COMPREHENSIVE PLAN TO EXPAND THE PROGRAM TO
EACH COUNTY IN THE STATE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Artificial intelligence” means a machine–based system that:
(1) can, for a given set of human–defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2) uses machine and human–based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments and abstracts those perceptions into models through analysis in an
automated manner; and
(3) uses model inference to formulate options for information or action.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.